Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 63-21-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as “The Mississippi Motor Vehicle and Manufactured Housing Title Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-21; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 63-21-3.
Administration.

The terms and provisions of this chapter shall be administered by the Department of Revenue. The Department of Revenue shall have charge of all the affairs of administering the laws of the state relative to vehicle registration and titling and manufactured housing titling as hereinafter provided and may employ such administrative and clerical assistance, material and equipment as may be necessary to enable it to speedily, completely and efficiently perform the duties as outlined in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-22; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 123, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 63-21-5.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall, for the purpose of this chapter, have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this section except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“State Tax Commission” or “department” means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi.

“Dealer” means every person engaged regularly in the business of buying, selling or exchanging motor vehicles, trailers, semitrailers, trucks, tractors or other character of commercial or industrial motor vehicles in this state, and having in this state an established place of business as defined in Section 27-19-303, Mississippi Code of 1972. The term “dealer” shall also mean every person engaged regularly in the business of buying, selling or exchanging manufactured housing in this state, and licensed as a dealer of manufactured housing by the Mississippi Department of Insurance.

“Designated agent” means each county tax collector in this state who may perform his duties under this chapter either personally or through any of his deputies, or such other persons as the Department of Revenue may designate. The term shall also mean those “dealers” as herein defined and/or their officers and employees and other persons who are appointed by the Department of Revenue in the manner provided in Section 63-21-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, to perform the duties of “designated agent” for the purposes of this chapter.

“Implement of husbandry” means every vehicle designed and adapted exclusively for agricultural, horticultural or livestock raising operations or for lifting or carrying an implement of husbandry and in either case not subject to registration if used upon the highways.

“Vehicle identification number” means the numbers and letters on a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home designated by the manufacturer or assigned by the Department of Revenue for the purpose of identifying the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home.

“Lien” means every kind of written lease which is substantially equivalent to an installment sale or which provides for a right of purchase; conditional sale; reservation of title; deed of trust; chattel mortgage; trust receipt; and every other written agreement or instrument of whatever kind or character whereby an interest other than absolute title is sought to be held or given on a motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home.

“Lienholder” means any natural person, firm, copartnership, association or corporation holding a lien as herein defined on a motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home.

“Manufactured housing” or “manufactured home” means any structure, transportable in one or more sections, which in the traveling mode, is eight (8) body feet or more in width or forty (40) body feet or more in length or, when erected on site, is three hundred twenty (320) or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning and electrical systems contained therein; except that such terms shall include any structure which meets all the requirements of this paragraph except the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development and complies with the standards established under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 USCS, Section 5401.

“Manufacturer” means any person regularly engaged in the business of manufacturing, constructing or assembling motor vehicles, manufactured homes or mobile homes, either within or without this state.

“Mobile home” means any structure, transportable in one or more sections, which in the traveling mode, is eight (8) body feet or more in width or forty (40) body feet or more in length or, when erected on site, is three hundred twenty (320) or more square feet and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning and electrical systems contained therein and manufactured prior to June 15, 1976. Any mobile home designated as realty on or before July 1, 1999, shall continue to be designated as realty so that a security interest will be made by incorporating such mobile home in a deed of trust.

“Motorcycle” means every motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground, but excluding a farm tractor.

“Motor vehicle” means every automobile, motorcycle, mobile trailer, semitrailer, truck, truck tractor, trailer and every other device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway which is required to have a road or bridge privilege license, except such as is moved by animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

“New vehicle” means a motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home which has never been the subject of a first sale for use.

“Used vehicle” means a motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home that has been the subject of a first sale for use, whether within this state or elsewhere.

“Owner” means a person or persons holding the legal title of a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home; in the event a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home is the subject of a deed of trust or a chattel mortgage or an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof or other like agreement, with the right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with the immediate right of possession vested in the grantor in the deed of trust, mortgagor, conditional vendee or lessee, the grantor, mortgagor, conditional vendee or lessee shall be deemed the owner for the purpose of this chapter.

“Person” includes every natural person, firm, copartnership, association or corporation.

“Pole trailer” means every vehicle without motive power designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach or pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregularly shaped loads such as poles, pipes, boats or structural members capable generally of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections.

“Security agreement” means a written agreement which reserves or creates a security interest.

“Security interest” means an interest in a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home reserved or created by agreement and which secures payment or performance of an obligation. The term includes the interest of a lessor under a lease intended as security. A security interest is “perfected” when it is valid against third parties generally, subject only to specific statutory exceptions.

“Special mobile equipment” means every vehicle not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property and only incidentally operated or moved over a highway, including, but not limited to: ditch-digging apparatus, well-boring apparatus and road construction and maintenance machinery such as asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, tractors other than truck tractors, ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, road rollers, scarifiers, earth-moving carryalls and scrapers, power shovels and draglines, and self-propelled cranes, vehicles so constructed that they exceed eight (8) feet in width and/or thirteen (13) feet six (6) inches in height, and earth-moving equipment. The term does not include house trailers, dump trucks, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes or shovels, or other vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to which machinery has been attached.

“Nonresident” means every person who is not a resident of this state.

“Current address” means a new address different from the address shown on the application or on the certificate of title. The owner shall within thirty (30) days after his address is changed from that shown on the application or on the certificate of title notify the department of the change of address in the manner prescribed by the department.

“Odometer” means an instrument for measuring and recording the actual distance a motor vehicle travels while in operation; but shall not include any auxiliary instrument designed to be reset by the operator of the motor vehicle for the purpose of recording the distance traveled on trips.

“Odometer reading” means the actual cumulative distance traveled disclosed on the odometer.

“Odometer disclosure statement” means a statement certified by the owner of the motor vehicle to the transferee or to the department as to the odometer reading.

“Mileage” means actual distance that a vehicle has traveled.

“Trailer” means every vehicle other than a “pole trailer” as defined in this chapter without motive power designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle for the purpose of hauling goods or products. The term “trailer” shall not refer to any structure, transportable in one or more sections regardless of size, when erected on site, and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning and electrical systems contained therein regardless of the date of manufacture.

“Salvage mobile home” or “salvage manufactured home” means a mobile home or manufactured home for which a certificate of title has been issued that an insurance company obtains from the owner as a result of paying a total loss claim resulting from collision, fire, flood, wind or other occurrence. The term “salvage mobile home” or “salvage manufactured home” does not mean or include and is not applicable to a mobile home or manufactured home that is twenty (20) years old or older.

“Salvage certificate of title” means a document issued by the department for a salvage mobile home or salvage manufactured home as defined in this chapter.

“All-terrain vehicle” means a motor vehicle that is designed for off-road use and is not required to have a motor vehicle privilege license.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-23; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 328, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 124, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 63-21-7.
Administration.

The State Tax Commission shall prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, certificates of title, notices of security interests, and all other notices and forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The State Tax Commission may:

Promulgate such rules and regulations deemed by it to be appropriate to implement the provisions of the chapter.

Make necessary investigations to procure information required to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Assign a new vehicle identification number to a vehicle if it has none, or if its vehicle identification number is destroyed or obliterated, and then shall issue a new certificate of title showing the new identifying number or make an appropriate endorsement on the original certificate.

The State Tax Commission shall make available information concerning the status of a title on any vehicle as reflected by the records in a manner as prescribed by the State Tax Commission. Such information supplied by the State Tax Commission shall be considered official only if in writing. The State Tax Commission shall charge the fees as set forth in Section 63-21-63. However, no fee shall be charged Mississippi law enforcement agencies or law enforcement agencies of any other state when such state furnishes like or similar information without charge to the State Tax Commission or other Mississippi law enforcement agencies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-48; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 28; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-21-9.
Requirement of certificate of title.

Except as provided in Section 63-21-11, every owner of a motor vehicle as defined in this chapter, which is in this state and which is manufactured or assembled after July 1, 1969, or which is the subject of first sale for use after July 1, 1969, and every owner of a manufactured home as defined in this chapter, which is in this state and which is manufactured or assembled after July 1, 1999, or which is the subject of first sale for use after July 1, 1999, shall make application to the State Tax Commission for a certificate of title with the following exceptions:

Voluntary application for title may be made for any model motor vehicle which is in this state after July 1, 1969, and for any model manufactured home or mobile home which is in this state after July 1, 1999, and any person bringing a motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home into this state from a state which requires titling shall make application for title to the State Tax Commission within thirty (30) days thereafter.

After July 1, 1969, any dealer, acting for himself, or another, who sells, trades or otherwise transfers any new or used vehicle as defined in this chapter, and after July 1, 1999, any dealer, acting for himself, or another, who sells, trades or otherwise transfers any new or used manufactured home or mobile home as defined in this chapter, or any designated agent, shall furnish to the purchaser or transferee, without charge for either application or certificate of title, an application for title of said vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home and cause to be forwarded to the State Tax Commission any and all documents required by the commission to issue certificate of title to the purchaser or transferee. The purchaser or transferee may then use the duplicate application for title as a permit to operate vehicle as provided in Section 63-21-67, until certificate of title is received.

Voluntary application for title may be made for any model all-terrain vehicle which is in this state.

A dealer who sells, trades or otherwise transfers any new or used all-terrain vehicles as defined in this chapter, may furnish to the purchaser or transferee, without charge for either application or certificate of title, an application for title of said vehicle, and cause to be forwarded to the State Tax Commission any and all documents required by the commission to issue certificate of title to the purchaser or transferee.

Any dealer, acting for himself or another who sells, trades or otherwise transfers any vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home required to be titled under this chapter who does not comply with the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined a sum not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-24; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 4; Laws, 1970, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 333; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 4; Laws, 2005, ch. 335, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 63-21-11.
Exceptions to requirement of certificate of title.

No certificate of title need be obtained for:

A vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home owned by the United States or any agency thereof;

A vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home owned by a manufacturer or dealer and held for sale, even though incidentally moved on the highway or used for purposes of testing or demonstration, or a vehicle used by a manufacturer solely for testing;

A vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home owned by a nonresident of this state and not required by law to be registered in this state;

A vehicle regularly engaged in the interstate transportation of persons or property for which a currently effective certificate of title has been issued in another state;

A vehicle moved solely by animal power;

An implement of husbandry;

Special mobile equipment;

A pole trailer;

Utility trailers of less than five thousand (5,000) pounds gross vehicle weight;

A manufactured home with respect to which the requirements of subsections (1) through (5) of Section 63-21-30, as applicable, have been satisfied unless with respect to the same manufactured home or mobile home there has been recorded an affidavit of severance pursuant to subsection (6) of Section 63-21-30.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the issuance of a certificate of title to the nonresident owner of an all-terrain vehicle that is purchased in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-25; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 5; Laws, 2005, ch. 335, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2005; Laws, 2018, ch. 401, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-21-13.
Designated agents of Department of Revenue generally.

The tax collector of each of the several counties in this state shall by virtue of his office be a designated agent of the Department of Revenue. Such tax collectors may perform their duties under this chapter either personally or through any of their deputies.

Every licensed dealer as defined in this chapter including wholesale dealers, shall be a designated agent of the Department of Revenue. Such dealers may perform their duties under this chapter either personally or through any of their officers or employees. Such dealers or persons shall enter into a bond with a surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety thereon, payable to the State of Mississippi in a sum to be determined by the department, but in no case to be less than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties under this chapter.

The Department of Revenue may appoint persons other than licensed dealers as its designated agents, provided that such appointees shall enter into a bond with a surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety thereon, payable to the State of Mississippi in a sum to be determined by the commission, but in no case to be less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-26; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 6; Laws, 1970, ch. 483, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-21-15.
Application for certificate of title; expedited title processing.

The application for the certificate of title of a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home in this state shall be made by the owner to a designated agent, on the form the Department of Revenue prescribes, and shall contain or be accompanied by the following, if applicable:

The name, driver’s license number, if the owner has been issued a driver’s license, current residence and mailing address of the owner;

(i) If a vehicle, a description of the vehicle, including the following data: year, make, model, vehicle identification number, type of body, the number of cylinders, odometer reading at the time of application, and whether new or used; and

If a manufactured home or mobile home, a description of the manufactured home or mobile home, including the following data: year, make, model number, serial number and whether new or used;

The date of purchase by applicant, the name and address of the person from whom the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home was acquired, and the names and addresses of any lienholders in the order of their priority and the dates of their security agreements;

In connection with the transfer of ownership of a manufactured home or mobile home sold by a sheriff’s bill of sale, a copy of the sheriff’s bill of sale;

(i) An odometer disclosure statement made by the transferor of a motor vehicle. The statement shall read:

Click to view

Notwithstanding the requirements above, the following exemptions as to odometer disclosure shall be in effect:

1. A vehicle having a gross vehicle weight rating of more than sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds.

2. A vehicle that is not self-propelled.

3. A vehicle that is ten (10) years old or older.

4. A vehicle sold directly by the manufacturer to any agency of the United States in conformity with contractual specifications.

5. A transferor of a new vehicle prior to its first transfer for purposes other than resale need not disclose the vehicle’s odometer mileage.

In connection with the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle, each transferor shall disclose the mileage to the transferee in writing on the title or on the document being used to reassign the title, which form shall be prescribed and furnished by the Department of Revenue. This written disclosure must be signed by the transferor and transferee, including the printed name of both parties.

Any person who knowingly gives a false statement concerning the odometer reading on an odometer disclosure statement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of up to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment of up to one (1) year, or both, at the discretion of the court. These penalties shall be cumulative, supplemental and in addition to the penalties provided by any other law; and

For previously used manufactured homes and mobile homes that previously have not been titled in this state or any other state, a disclosure statement shall be made by the owner of the manufactured home or mobile home applying for the certificate of title. That statement shall read:

Click to view

The application shall be accompanied by such evidence as the Department of Revenue reasonably requires to identify the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home and to enable the Department of Revenue to determine whether the owner is entitled to a certificate of title and the existence or nonexistence of security interests in the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home and whether the applicant is liable for a use tax as provided by Sections 27-67-1 through 27-67-33.

If the application is for a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home purchased from a dealer, it shall contain the name and address of any lienholder holding a security interest created or reserved at the time of the sale and the date of his security agreement and it shall be signed by the dealer as well as the owner. The designated agent shall promptly mail or deliver the application to the Department of Revenue.

If the application is for a new vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home, it shall contain the certified manufacturer’s statement of origin showing proper assignments to the applicant and a copy of each security interest document.

Each application shall contain or be accompanied by the certificate of a designated agent that the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home has been physically inspected by him and that the vehicle identification number and descriptive data shown on the application, pursuant to the requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this section, are correct, and also that he has identified the person signing the application and witnessed the signature. If the application is to receive a branded title for a vehicle for which a salvage certificate of title has been issued, the application shall be accompanied by a sworn affidavit that the vehicle complies with the requirements of this section, Section 63-21-39 and the regulations promulgated by the Department of Revenue under Section 63-21-39.

If the application is for a first certificate of title on a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home other than a new vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home, then the application shall conform with the requirements of this section except that in lieu of the manufacturer’s statement of origin, the application shall be accompanied by a copy of the bill of sale of said motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home whereby the applicant claims title or in lieu thereof, in the case of a motor vehicle, certified copies of the last two (2) years’ tag and tax receipts or in lieu thereof, in any case, such other information the Department of Revenue may reasonably require to identify the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home and to enable the Department of Revenue to determine ownership of the vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home and the existence or nonexistence of security interest in it. If the application is for a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home last previously registered in another state or country, the application shall also be accompanied by the certificate of title issued by the other state or country, if any, properly assigned.

Every designated agent within this state shall, no later than the next business day after they are received by him, forward to the Department of Revenue by mail, postage prepaid, the originals of all applications received by him, together with such evidence of title as may have been delivered to him by the applicants.

An application for certificate of title and information to be placed on an application for certificate of title may be transferred electronically as provided in Section 63-21-16.

The Department of Revenue shall issue a certificate of title or any other document applied for under this chapter to the designated agent, owner or lienholder of the motor vehicle or of the manufactured home or mobile home, as appropriate, not more than thirty (30) days after the application and required fee prescribed under Section 63-21-63 or Section 63-21-64 are received unless the applicant requests expedited processing under subsection (10) of this section.

The Department of Revenue shall establish an expedited processing procedure for the receipt of applications and the issuance of certificates of title and any other documents issued under this chapter, except a replacement certificate of title as provided under Section 63-21-27(2), for motor vehicles and for manufactured homes or mobile homes. Any designated agent, lienholder or owner requesting the issuance of any such document, at his or her option, shall receive such expedited processing upon payment of a fee in the amount of Thirty Dollars ($30.00). Such fee shall be in addition to the fees applicable to the issuance of any such documents under Section 63-21-63 and Section 63-21-64.

When expedited title processing is requested, the applicable fees are paid and all documents and information necessary for the Department of Revenue to issue the certificate of title or other documents applied for are received by the department, then the department shall complete processing of the application and issue the title or document applied for within seventy-two (72) hours of the time of receipt, excluding weekends and holidays.

“Federal and state law requires that you state the mileage in connection with the transfer of ownership. Failure to complete or providing a false statement may result in fine and/or imprisonment. I state that the (no tenths) miles and to the best of my knowledge that it reflects the actual mileage of the vehicle described herein, unless one (1) of the following statements is checked: odometer now reads (1) I hereby certify that to the best of my knowledge the odometer reading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of its mechanical limits. (2) I hereby certify that the odometer reading is not the actual mileage. WARNING — ODOMETER DISCREPANCY!”

“I state that the previously used manufactured home or mobile home owned by me for which I am applying for a certificate of title, to the best of my knowledge: (1) Has never been declared a total loss due to flood damage, fire damage, wind damage or other damage; or (2) Has previously been declared a total loss due to: (a) Collision; (b) Flood; (c) Fire; (d) Wind; (e) Other (please describe): .”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8125-27; Laws, 1968, ch. 531, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 328, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 575, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 539, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 6; Laws, 2004, ch. 557, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 466, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2006; Laws, 2018, ch. 358, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 63-21-16.
Electronic transmittal of information by banks and other lending institutions; duties of institutions with respect to applications for certificates of title; entry of applications on statewide title registration system; addition of second lienholder to certificate of title; applications for certificates of title after assignment of liens; issuance of new certificate of title by Department of Revenue; connection of institutions to title registration system; penalties for noncompliance with statute or regulations by institutions; conditions for issuance of certificate of title to manufactured or mobile home for which title has been retired to real property.

All designated agents appointed by the Department of Revenue under Section 63-21-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, may electronically transmit to the Department of Revenue information entered by them on applications for a certificate of title given in connection with the sale or transfer of a motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home or a loan for which the owner’s motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home is pledged to that institution as collateral for the loan. The format and the data required to be transmitted shall be established by the Department of Revenue. Transmission of data shall meet minimum criteria and edits established by the Department of Revenue equal to any edit presently existing in the statewide title registration system, or as may be established, to which the county tax collectors shall also conform. All data transmitted must successfully pass edits established by the Department of Revenue, including lienholder name, mailing address and lienholder account number assigned to a lienholder by the Department of Revenue to identify the lienholder, for the purpose of causing the data to appear in the certificate of title for which the application is made.

It shall be the responsibility of the designated agent to verify all data before it is electronically transmitted. It shall also be the responsibility of the designated agent to ensure that the required certification of designated agent and the certification of statement of facts that are contained on the application for certificate of title appear above the signatures of both the owner and the authorized representative of the designated agent. Data which cannot be transmitted because of error shall be corrected by the designated agent when the statewide title registration system indicates that the data is erroneous or is not valid for the purposes of titling the motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home or for transfer of the data.

When an institution has agreed to loan money for the purchase of a motor vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home, the institution shall complete an application for certificate of title or require the borrower to provide to the institution the copy of the application for certificate of title contained in the application packet which is designated “Lienholder’s Copy” according to provisions of the Motor Vehicle and Manufactured Housing Title Law, which the owner will receive from the county tax collector or any designated agent upon completion of the application for title and registration process.

An application for certificate of title originating from a designated agent shall be entered on the statewide title registration system by the originating lending institution when the transaction is for the purpose of perfecting the institution’s interest in a vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home currently owned or purchased by the applicant, in connection with application for certificate of title or the purchase of a license tag or both.

When an institution in this state adds a second lien on a certificate of title in possession of a first lienholder institution in this state, the second lienholder institution seeking to be shown on the certificate of title shall:

Prepare the application for certificate of title in accordance with the requirements of Sections 63-21-15 and 63-21-45(1)(c);

Obtain all required signatures; and

Forward the completed application for certificate of title to the first lienholder together with any necessary remittance advice, a check for the title fee payable to the Department of Revenue and a cover letter to the first lienholder requesting that the first lienholder attach the certificate of title to the required documents sent by the second lienholder and then forward the application, certificate of title and required documents to the Department of Revenue.

Upon receipt of the application for certificate of title from the second lienholder institution to record the second lien, the first lienholder institution shall compare the data contained in the application for certificate of title to the information contained in the original certificate of title. If the first lienholder institution is satisfied as to the ownership, accuracy and order of priority of liens as shown in the application, it shall enter the data contained on the application for certificate of title prepared by the second lienholder on the statewide title registration system, including the designated agent number of the second lienholder. After entering the data from the application for certificate of title, the first lienholder institution shall immediately forward the application for certificate of title with the certificate of title attached to the application, the remittance advice and the second lienholder’s check for the title fee to the Department of Revenue within three (3) working days.

In an assignment of lien pursuant to Section 63-21-47, the assignee shall receive the notice of assignment along with the current title attached and with the assignors interest open. The assignee lienholder shall prepare an application for certificate of title according to the notice of assignment, showing the assignee institution as the lienholder, and then shall electronically transmit the data to the Department of Revenue. The completed application shall be forwarded to the Department of Revenue within three (3) working days.

The Department of Revenue, upon receipt of applications for certificate of title, shall verify the data by accessing it on the statewide title registration system by the title application control number appearing on the application for title. After receiving verification that is satisfactory to the Department of Revenue that the data necessary for the issuance of a new certificate of title exists, the Department of Revenue shall issue a new certificate of title that records the interests of all the parties named in the application for certificate of title.

Designated agents shall be connected to the statewide title registration system for the purpose of electronic transfer of applications for certificate of title data in the order of priority established by the Department of Revenue.

If a participating designated agent fails to comply with the provisions of this section or the rules adopted by the Department of Revenue to implement this section, the Department of Revenue may impose a penalty of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each instance of noncompliance. Any penalty imposed under this section not paid within thirty (30) days after a notice is given shall be subject to collection from the bond of the designated agent that is required to be provided under the provisions of Section 63-21-13(3). The penalty provided shall also be assessable, due and collectible from any licensed motor vehicle dealer or manufactured home or mobile home dealer for failure to accept an application for certificate of title for each and every vehicle, manufactured home or mobile home he sells to a consumer. These penalties shall be cumulative, supplemental and in addition to the penalties provided by any other law.

This section shall apply to all designated agents appointed by the Department of Revenue under Section 63-21-13, that choose to electronically transmit information on applications for certificates of title to the Department of Revenue. This section shall not apply to other designated agents.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Department of Revenue shall not issue a certificate of title to a manufactured home or mobile home with respect to which title has been retired to real property under Section 63-21-30 unless with respect to the same manufactured home or mobile home title has been severed from real property pursuant to Section 63-21-30.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 396, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 556, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1999; Laws, 2018, ch. 401, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 2019.